Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.2101

Implementation of legislative intent.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

In developing rules under RCW 10.77.210(2), the department shall implement the following legislative intent: Increasing public safety; and making decisions based on a person's current conduct and mental condition rather than the classification of the charges.

[ 1998 c 297 s 46.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.